Utah statutes.
53B-3-105.   Appointment of police or security personnel -- Powers.
(1)  Members of the police or security department of any college or university
are appointed by the board.
(2)  Upon appointment, they are peace officers and have all the powers
possessed by policemen in cities and by sheriffs, including the power to make
arrests on view or on warrant of violation of state statutes and city or
county ordinances.
(3)  Members of the police or security department of any college or university
also have the power to enforce all rules and regulations promulgated by the
board as related to the institution.
